Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 12 Platting and Dedication

Cross references. —

For authority of railroad companies having rights of way or station grounds acquired under an act of congress to file copy of map, etc., with county clerk, and as to duty of clerk with reference thereto, see §

34-1-124

.

As to penalty for changing landmarks, see §

6-3-202

.

For provision requiring a survey and map to be included in an application for incorporation of a town, see §

15-1-202

.

For provision requiring survey and plat in connection with subdivision for sale in cities operating under the city manager form of government, see §

15-4-310

.

For duty of county surveyor to make county surveys and keep plats, see §

18-3-702

.

As to surveyors and engineers, see §§ 33-29-114 to 33-29-139.

As to survey and platting of cemetery grounds, see §

35-8-101

.

For provision requiring assessment rolls in tax list to show lands by township, range, etc., see §

39-13-103

.

Cited

in

Snake River Venture v. Board of County Comm'rs, 616 P.2d 744,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1980).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Administrative Law — A Case Against Retroactivity in Agency Permitting. Evanston v. Griffith, 715 P.2d 1381,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 517

(Wyo. 1986),” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 171 (1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

12 Am. Jur. 2d Boundaries §§ 5, 6, 39; 23 Am. Jur. 2d Dedication § 1 et seq.

Conveyance of lot with reference to map or plat as giving purchaser rights in indicated streets, alleys, or areas not abutting on his lot, 7 ALR2d 607.

Construction of regulations as to subdivision maps or plats with respect to question of dedication of portion of land to public use, 11 ALR2d 524.

Acceptance of some of streets, alleys, and the like appearing on plat as acceptance of all, 32 ALR2d 953.

Construction or maintenance of sewers, water pipes, or the like by public authorities in roadway, street, or alley as indicating dedication, 52 ALR2d 263.

Right, by dedication, of fishing, boating, bathing, or the like in inland lakes, 57 ALR2d 569.

Power of municipal corporation to exchange its real property as affected by restrictive dedication, 60 ALR2d 220.

Relative rights, under dedication, to minerals, oil and gas underlying streets, alleys or parks, 62 ALR2d 1311.

Power of mortgagor to dedicate land or interest therein, 63 ALR2d 1160.

Right of owner of servient tenement subject to right-of-way to dedicate his land, 69 ALR2d 1236.

Right of dedicator of parkway in center of street, or successor in interest, to reversion, 81 ALR2d 1436.

Revocation or withdrawal of dedication by grantees or successors in interest of dedicator, 86 ALR2d 860.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance requiring land developer to dedicate portion of land for recreational purposes or make payment in lieu thereof, 43 ALR3d 862.

Failure of vendor to comply with statute or ordinance requiring approval or recording of plat prior to conveyance of property as rendering sale void or voidable, 77 ALR3d 1058.

Private improvement of land dedicated but not used as street as estopping public rights, 36 ALR4th 625.

11 C.J.S. Boundaries § 24; 26 C.J.S. Dedication § 1 et seq.; 62 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations §§ 76, 77.

§ 34-12-101.
Application of provisions.

None of the provisions of this act [§§

34-12-101

through

34-12-104

,

34-12-106

through

34-12-115

] shall be construed to require replatting in any case where plats have been made and recorded in pursuance of any law heretofore in force; and all plats heretofore filed for record, and not subsequently vacated, are hereby declared valid, notwithstanding irregularities and omissions in the manner or form of acknowledgment or judge’s certificate.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 116, § 13; R.S. 1887, § 1412; R.S. 1899, § 779; C.S. 1910, § 1863; C.S. 1920, § 2147; R.S. 1931, § 116-213; C.S. 1945, § 29-1113; W.S. 1957, § 34-112.

Cited

in

Carnahan v. Lewis, 2012 WY 45, 273 P.3d 1065,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Mar. 27, 2012).

§ 34-12-102.
Description of townsites and subdivisions; effect; duty to record.

Every original owner or proprietor of any tract or parcel of land, who has heretofore subdivided, or shall hereafter subdivide the same into three (3) or more parts for the purpose of laying out any town or city, or any addition thereto, or any part thereof, or suburban lots, shall cause a plat of such subdivision, with references to known or permanent monuments, to be made, which shall accurately describe all the subdivisions of such tract or parcel of land, numbering the same by progressive numbers, and giving the dimensions, and length and breadth thereof, and the breadth and courses of all the streets and alleys established therein. Descriptions of lots or parcels of land in such subdivisions, according to the number and designation thereof, on said plat contained, in conveyances, or for the purposes of taxation, shall be deemed good and valid for all intents and purposes. The duty to file for record a plat, as provided herein [§§

34-12-101

through

34-12-104

,

34-12-106

through

34-12-115

], shall attach as a covenant of warranty, in all conveyances of any part or parcel of such subdivisions by the original owners or proprietors, against any and all assessments, costs and damages, paid, lost or incurred by any grantee, or person claiming under him, in consequence of the omission on the part of said owner or proprietors to file such plat.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 116, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1400; R.S. 1899, § 767; C.S. 1910, § 1851; C.S. 1920, § 2135; R.S. 1931, § 116-201; C.S. 1945, § 29-1101; W.S. 1957, § 34-113.

Town did not acquire title in fee simple to disputed land

where dedicatory plats showed that disputed land was included in a railroad's right-of-way. Glenrock v. Chicago & N. W. R.R., 73 Wyo. 385, 279 P.2d 894,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1955).

Ratification of plat by mortgagee. —

Mortgagee assented to and ratified dedication of property to the public where mortgage described the property by referring to proposed subdivision, the mortgagee never objected to subdivision being established or property being dedicated to public use, and it executed an addendum to plat stating it had been omitted from the plat in error and agreed to ratify the plat. River Props. Pshp. v. Willoughby, 944 P.2d 1145,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1997).

Applied

in

Ruby Drilling Co. v. Billingsly, 660 P.2d 377,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

Bakken v. Price, 613 P.2d 1222,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 286

(Wyo. 1980); Gregory v. Sanders, 635 P.2d 795,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 384

(Wyo. 1981); Ahearn v. Town of Wheatland, 2002 WY 12, 39 P.3d 409,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2002); Carnahan v. Lewis, 2012 WY 45, 273 P.3d 1065,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Mar. 27, 2012).

Cited

in

Graff v. City of Casper, 73 Wyo. 486, 281 P.2d 685,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 12

, 52 A.L.R.2d 254 (1955); Prudential Trust Co. v. City of Laramie, 492 P.2d 971,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1972); Tobin v. Pursel, 539 P.2d 361,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1975).

§ 34-12-103.
Contents of plat; acknowledgment; approval by county commissioners or governing body of cities or towns; filing and recording.

Every plat shall contain a statement to the effect that “the above or foregoing subdivision of (here insert a correct description of the land or parcel subdivided) as appears on this plat, is with the free consent, and in accordance with the desires of the undersigned owners and proprietors”, which shall be signed by the owners and proprietors, and shall be duly acknowledged before some officer authorized to take the acknowledgement of deeds. The plat shall meet the approval of the board of county commissioners if it is of land situated without the boundaries of any city or town or by the governing body of the city or town if situated within the boundaries of such city or town. Provided, however, that any plat of land which is adjacent to any incorporated city or town or within one (1) mile of the boundaries of any city or town and which is not subject to regulation under and pursuant to a comprehensive plan adopted pursuant to W.S. 18-5-202(b), shall be jointly approved by both the board of county commissioners of the county and the governing body of the city or town before the plat shall be filed and recorded in the office of the county clerk.

If a city or town approval is not required under this section and the plat is located within one (1) mile of the boundaries of a first class city or town, or within one-half (1/2) mile of a town with a population of less than four thousand (4,000), the board of county commissioners, upon receipt of a plat application, shall solicit comments from the governing body of the city or town relating to impacts to the city or town’s infrastructure or other development plans resulting from the proposed plat and development. The board shall consider the city or town’s comments that are received by the board at least twenty (20) business days prior to the scheduled final consideration of the plat proposal and shall respond in writing to the city or town about any items of disagreement. To the extent practical, the board of county commissioners shall ensure that a plat application meets the following:

Is consistent with any applicable city and county land use or comprehensive plan;

Conforms to any adopted street plan of the city, town or county;

Contains all areas for streets, roads and alleys that are dedicated rights-of-way;

Contains dedicated easements for all existing and proposed utilities; and

Contains any additional criteria the governing body of the city or town and the board of county commissioners agree to through a jointly adopted plan or voluntary agreement.

When executed, acknowledged and approved as provided in this section, the plat shall be filed and recorded in the office of the clerk of the proper county.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 116, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1401; R.S. 1899, § 768; C.S. 1910, § 1852; C.S. 1920, § 2136; R.S. 1931, § 116-202; Laws 1943, ch. 88, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 29-1102; Laws 1965, ch. 196, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-114; 2018 ch. 83, § 1, effective January 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to acknowledgment of conveyances generally, see §

34-1-113

et seq.

As to Acknowledgment Act generally, see §

34-2-114

et seq.

History of section. —

See Prudential Trust Co. v. City of Laramie, 492 P.2d 971,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1972).

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, in (a), deleted “When thus executed, acknowledged and approved, said plat shall be filed for record and recorded in the office of the clerk of the proper county” at the beginning of the third sentence and inserted “and which is not subject to regulation under and pursuant to a comprehensive plan adopted pursuant to W.S. 18-5-202(b)”; added (b) and (c); and made stylistic changes.

Approval by the governing body of the city is a statutory prerequisite

to the validity of the dedication. Prudential Trust Co. v. Laramie, 492 P.2d 971,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1972).

Collateral attack of dedication prohibited. —

Purchaser of property from mortgagee which had foreclosed on property could not collaterally attack dedication of property made after mortgage was executed where the public relied on property dedication when city annexed it and used the dedicated parks and streets. River Props. Pshp. v. Willoughby, 944 P.2d 1145,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1997).

City may set reasonable requirements for approval of plat. —

The right and duty of the city to approve a plat necessarily carries with it the right to set reasonable and just prerequisites and requirements for approval of the plat, and in particular in the area of bringing the plat into conformity with other areas with respect to lots, blocks, streets, and the like. Prudential Trust Co. v. Laramie, 492 P.2d 971,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1972).

Authority to disapprove proposed subdivision within one mile of city limits. —

City had authority to approve or disapprove a proposed subdivision because it was within one mile of the city's limits pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

34-12-103

and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-1-411

; also, property owners did not point to any law establishing that the city had a ministerial duty that was plainly defined and required by law such that mandamus relief was warranted.
Gose v. City of Douglas, 2008 WY 126, 193 P.3d 1159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2008), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

But may not act in arbitrary or capricious manner. —

The rule that administrative officers and boards will not be permitted to act in an arbitrary or capricious manner, and that courts will restrain such action, applies to such actions as those of a city council when it deals with the platting of land. Prudential Trust Co. v. Laramie, 492 P.2d 971,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1972).

Effect given to lines and language of plat. —

In construing a plat of an addition to a town which complies with this section, effect must be given to lines of the plat as well as the language. Kinsell v. Farmers' Lumber Co., 38 Wyo. 13, 264 P. 87,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1928).

Ratification of plat by mortgagee. —

Mortgagee assented to and ratified dedication of property to the public where mortgage described the property by referring to proposed subdivision, the mortgagee never objected to subdivision being established or property being dedicated to public use, and it executed an addendum to plat stating it had been omitted from the plat in error and agreed to ratify the plat. River Props. Pshp. v. Willoughby, 944 P.2d 1145,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1997).

Dedication annulled. —

Where recorded plat of addition to town complied with this section, insertion of word “vacated” on alley and part of street as shown on plat indicated intention of owner to annul alley, and put an end to existence of part of street so marked. Kinsell v. Farmers' Lumber Co., 38 Wyo. 13, 264 P. 87,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1928).

Applied

in

Ruby Drilling Co. v. Billingsly, 660 P.2d 377,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

Town of Marbleton v. Town of Big Piney, 719 P.2d 1389,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1986); Carnahan v. Lewis, 2012 WY 45, 273 P.3d 1065,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Mar. 27, 2012).

Cited

in

Graff v. City of Casper, 73 Wyo. 486, 281 P.2d 685,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 12

, 52 A.L.R.2d 254 (1955).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of one governmental subdivision to challenge annexation proceedings by another such subdivision, 17 ALR5th 195.

§ 34-12-104.
Townsites; effect of acknowledgment and recording.

The acknowledgment and recording of such plat, is equivalent to a deed in fee simple of such portion of the premises platted as is on such plat set apart for streets, or other public use, or is thereon dedicated to charitable, religious or educational purposes.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 116, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1402; R.S. 1899, § 769; C.S. 1910, § 1853; C.S. 1920, § 2137; R.S. 1931, § 116-203; C.S. 1945, § 29-1103; W.S. 1957, § 34-115.

Property acquirable by adverse possession or prescription. —

Although the legislature has expressly given municipalities the power to acquire property through eminent domain and statutory dedication, those two means are not exclusive. A municipality may, in appropriate circumstances, acquire real property by adverse possession or prescription. Koontz v. Superior, 746 P.2d 1264,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 558

(Wyo. 1987).

A dedication conveys an easement in the people to use the streets and alleys.

Morad v. Brown, 549 P.2d 312,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1976).

The interest a city acquired in the premises as a result of a dedication before the enactment of §§

15-1-415

and

15-4-305

, as to additions and vacation of streets, was, at best, a title in trust for the public, granting to the city the right to hold, use, occupy, and enjoy the premises for public use as a street, and once that right was terminated by vacation, the city no longer had any title or interest in the premises and it had nothing to sell or to convey. Payne v. Laramie, 398 P.2d 557,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1965).

Statutory dedication creates 3 separate interests. —

Rather than resulting in an easement to the public in the platted area designated for streets, statutory dedication creates three separate interests: (1) the first is an estate in fee simple determinable in the surface estate conveyed to the public authority, with the transferor retaining a possibility of reverter; (2) this possibility of reverter comprises the second interest generated; (3) the third interest is a mineral estate in fee lying below the street, and created by horizontal severance upon dedication. Town of Moorcroft v. Lang, 779 P.2d 1180,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1989), overruled in part, Carnahan v. Lewis, 2012 WY 45, 273 P.3d 1065,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2012).

Plain language requires an intent to dedicate. —

Where the plat that was filed referred only to a utility easement, and not to a dedication, dedication did not occur; therefore, there was nothing to prevent the owner of the burdened property from creating a second easement, for a driveway, that was not inconsistent with the utility easement. Owsley v. Robinson, 2003 WY 33, 65 P.3d 374,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2003), overruled in part, Carnahan v. Lewis, 2012 WY 45, 273 P.3d 1065,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2012).

Public, not just owners in subdivision, gain interest in platted streets. —

This section is intended to grant the public an interest in the streets and ways set out on a properly platted and recorded subdivision map. The owners of lots in the subdivision only have a right to the use of such streets and ways for ingress and egress to their property; they have no possessory interest in that area sufficient to provide the underpinning for an action in trespass. Ruby Drilling Co. v. Billingsly, 660 P.2d 377,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1983).

This section does not indicate who the grantee shall be construed to be,

and the court has no basis for reading into it something which is not there. Gay Johnson's Wyo. Automotive Serv. Co. v. Cheyenne, 367 P.2d 787,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1961), reh'g denied, 369 P.2d 863,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1962); Payne v. Laramie, 398 P.2d 557,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1965).

But under this section and §

34-12-109

city is not recipient of fee. —

The absence of an indication in this section as to whom the grantee shall be construed to be, and the provisions of §

34-12-109

, seem to nullify any thought that the municipal corporation could be construed as a recipient of the fee. Gay Johnson's Wyo. Automotive Serv. Co. v. Cheyenne, 369 P.2d 863,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1962); Payne v. Laramie, 398 P.2d 557,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1965).

No mineral rights transfer upon “public use” dedication. —

A land company, upon the transfer of certain areas to individual lot purchasers, dedicated the streets and alleys to “public use.” This dedication did not operate to transfer any mineral rights, which remained in the land company. Town of Moorcroft v. Lang, 761 P.2d 96,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1988).

City acquires no mineral interest as result of this section. —

A city acquired no interest in the oil, gas or other minerals underlying its streets and alleys as a result of the recording and acknowledgment of subdivision plats pursuant to this section. City of Evanston v. Robinson, 702 P.2d 1283,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 506

(Wyo. 1985).

Acknowledgment and recording of dedication is not deed in fee simple. —

While the acknowledgment and recording by a city of a dedication is equivalent to a deed in fee simple, it is not a deed in fee simple. Payne v. Laramie, 398 P.2d 557,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1965).

But is analogous to taking by eminent domain where fee is not taken. —

Where the grant made by the dedication, whether by statute or otherwise, does not provide for the vesting of the fee in a public entity, the dedication is analogous to a mere taking by eminent domain where the fee is not taken. Payne v. Laramie, 398 P.2d 557,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1965).

And does not give public right to sell. —

A dedication of land does not give the public the same right to sell or dispose of the same that a private party has to land for which he holds the title in fee simple. Payne v. Laramie, 398 P.2d 557,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1965).

It could not be contended that, if a private owner dedicates a street or a block in a city to public use the public could convey it to a private party and have the property placed to some other use or purpose than that for which it was originally dedicated. Payne v. Laramie, 398 P.2d 557,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1965).

A dedication under this section, absent some other applicable statute, does not vest in a municipality a fee in the premises set apart for streets which upon vacation of the streets can be bartered and sold by the municipality. Payne v. Laramie, 398 P.2d 557,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1965).

The interpretation of § 637, Code of Iowa, 1851 (from which this section is derived), by the Iowa court that the language “fee simple” did not grant to the municipality the power to make sale of the premises laid out as a street was made prior to the time those provisions were enacted here, consequently, it is not unreasonable to hold in this respect that this section was adopted with that construction placed upon it. Payne v. Laramie, 398 P.2d 557,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1965).

Quoted

in

Gregory v. Sanders, 635 P.2d 795,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 384

(Wyo. 1981); Sare v. Sheridan County Bd. of County Comm'rs, 784 P.2d 593,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Kinsell v. Farmers' Lumber Co., 38 Wyo. 13, 264 P. 87,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1928); Sunshine Custom Paints & Body, Inc. v. S. Douglas Highway Water & Sewer Dist., 2007 WY 206, 173 P.3d 398,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 219

(Dec. 20, 2007).

§ 34-12-105.
Townsites; recording fees.

When any person, company or corporation, shall file a townsite plat, or an addition to a townsite, it must be accompanied by the fee listed in W.S. 18-3-402(a)(xvi)(O) for the purpose of filing and recording of said plat. The record of the plat shall include a description of the lots and blocks.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 118,§ 1; C.S. 1910, § 1865; C.S. 1920, § 2149; R.S. 1931, § 116-215; C.S. 1945, § 29-1115; W.S. 1957, § 34-116; 2019 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the first sentence, substituted "the" for "a” and "listed in W.S. 18-3-402(a)(xvi)(O)" for "of twenty-five dollars ($25.00)", deleted "purchasing an abstract book in which the lots and blocks must be described, this fee to include the" and added second sentence "The record of the plat shall include a description of the lots and blocks."

§ 34-12-106.
Vacation; generally.

Any such plat may be vacated by the proprietors thereof at any time before the sale of any lots therein, by a written instrument declaring the same to be vacated, duly executed, acknowledged or proved and recorded in the same office with the plat to be vacated, and the execution and recording of such writing shall operate to destroy the force and effect of the recording of the plat so vacated, and to divest all public rights in the streets, alleys, commons and public grounds laid out or described in such plat, and in case where any lots have been sold, the plat may be vacated as herein provided, by all the owners of lots in such plat joining in the execution of the writing aforesaid. No plat or portion thereof within the corporate limits of a city or town shall be vacated as herein provided without the approval of the city or town. No plat or portion thereof for which a subdivision permit has been obtained pursuant to W.S.

18-5-304

shall be vacated as herein provided without the approval of the county commissioners. No municipal or county approval under this section shall be arbitrarily or unreasonably withheld.

History.

C. L. 1876, ch. 116, § 5; R. S. 1887, § 1404; R. S. 1899, § 771; C. S. 1910, § 1885; C. S. 1920, § 2139; R. S. 1931, § 116-205; C. S. 1945, § 29-1105; W. S. 1957, § 34-117; Laws 1967, ch. 152, § 1; 2008, ch. 43, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added the final two sentences.

Requirements. —

Prior effort to vacate a subdivision plat by appellants'
predecessors-in-interest was not done in accordance with the statute because all owners of lots in the plat did not join in the affidavit of vacation; compliance was necessary as there was no question from the language contained in the original plat that the owner intended to dedicate the property for public use.
Carnahan v. Lewis, 2012 WY 45, 273 P.3d 1065,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2012).

Quoted

in

Ahearn v. Town of Wheatland, 2002 WY 12, 39 P.3d 409,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Town of Moorcroft v. Lang, 779 P.2d 1180,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1989); Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs for Sweetwater County, 2005 WY 54,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

, 110 P.3d 875 (2005).

§ 34-12-107.
Vacation; streets and alleys.

Streets and alleys so platted and laid out, or which have been platted or laid out under any prior law of this state regulating private plats, may be altered or vacated in the manner provided by law for the alteration or discontinuance of highways.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 116, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 770; C.S. 1910, § 1854; C.S. 1920, § 2138; R.S. 1931, § 116-204; C.S. 1945, § 29-1104; W.S. 1957, § 34-118.

Cross references. —

As to vacation of highways, see §§

24-3-101

to

24-3-127

.

This section does not make it compulsory to vacate a highway in the manner herein provided.

It is permissive only, and the supreme court would not be warranted in striking out the term “vacate” in §

15-6-104

, which authorizes the council of a city or town to “lay out, establish (,) vacate, widen, extend and open streets.” Thomas v. Jultak, 68 Wyo. 198, 231 P.2d 974,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1951).

Application to municipalities. —

This chapter seems to be an almost verbatim copy of the Revised Code of Iowa 1882, § 559 and subsequent sections. The Iowa court has held the section of the Iowa statute corresponding to this section has no application to municipalities but that the powers to be exercised by the city in vacating a street should be exercised under the provision similar to those in §

15-6-104

.Thomas v. Jultak, 68 Wyo. 198, 231 P.2d 974,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1951).

§ 34-12-108.
Vacation; partial vacation; when permitted.

Any part of a plat may be vacated under the provisions, and subject to the conditions of this act [§§

34-12-101

through

34-12-104

,

34-12-106

through

34-12-115

]; provided, such vacating does not abridge or destroy any of the rights and privileges of other proprietors in said plat; and provided, further, that nothing contained in this section shall authorize the closing or obstruction of any public highways laid out according to law.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 116, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 1405; R.S. 1899, § 772; C.S. 1910, § 1856; C.S. 1920, § 2140; R.S. 1931, § 116-206; C.S. 1945, § 29-1106; W.S. 1957, § 34-119.

Owners' rights affected. —

Attempt to vacate a plat affected appellees'
rights; appellees owned property in a subdivision that contained an easement dedicated to public use and platted to run through the subdivision from one access point to another.
Carnahan v. Lewis, 2012 WY 45, 273 P.3d 1065,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2012).

Quoted

in

Ahearn v. Town of Wheatland, 2002 WY 12, 39 P.3d 409,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs for Sweetwater County, 2005 WY 54,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

, 110 P.3d 875 (2005).

§ 34-12-109.
Vacation; partial vacation; effect on streets.

When any part of a plat shall be vacated as aforesaid, the proprietors of the lots so vacated may enclose the streets, alleys and public grounds adjoining lots in equal proportions.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 116, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 1406; R.S. 1899, § 773; C.S. 1910, § 1857; C.S. 1920, § 2141; R.S. 1931, § 116-207; C.S. 1945, § 29-1107; W.S. 1957, § 34-120.

Section shows city does not receive fee. —

This section would seem to nullify any thought that the municipal corporation could be construed as a recipient of the fee. Gay Johnson's Wyo. Automotive Serv. Co. v. Cheyenne, 367 P.2d 787,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1961), reh'g denied, 369 P.2d 863,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1962); Payne v. Laramie, 398 P.2d 557,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1965).

Quoted

in

City of Evanston v. Robinson, 702 P.2d 1283,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 506

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Town of Moorcroft v. Lang, 779 P.2d 1180,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 34-12-110.
Vacation; duty of county clerk.

The county clerk, in whose office the plats aforesaid are recorded, shall write in plain, legible letters across that part of the plat so vacated, the word “vacated”, and identify where the instrument of vacation is recorded.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 116,§ 8; R.S. 1887, § 1408; R.S. 1899, § 775; C.S. 1910, § 1859; C.S. 1920, § 2143; R.S. 1931, § 116-209; C.S. 1945, § 29-1108; W.S. 1957, § 34-121; 2019 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "the" for "said” and "identify where the" for "also make a reference on the same to the volume and page in which the said."

§ 34-12-111.
Vacation; platting by county surveyor; acknowledgment and recording; conveyance and assessment by number.

The owner of any lots in a plat so vacated, may cause the same and a proportionate part of adjacent streets and public grounds to be platted and numbered by the county surveyor; and when such plat is acknowledged by such owner, and is recorded in the clerk’s office of the county, such lots may be conveyed and assessed by the numbers given them on such plat.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 116, § 9; R.S. 1887, § 1407; R.S. 1899, § 774; C.S. 1910, § 1858; C.S. 1920, § 2142; R.S. 1931, § 116-208; C.S. 1945, § 29-1109; W.S. 1957, § 34-122.

Cited

in

Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs for Sweetwater County, 2005 WY 54,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

, 110 P.3d 875 (2005).

§ 34-12-112.
Procedure after failure to make plat; acknowledgment; recording; costs.

Whenever the original owner or proprietor of any subdivision of any land, as contemplated in W.S.

34-12-102

, has sold or conveyed any part thereof, or invested the public with any rights therein, and has failed and neglected to execute and file for record a plat, as provided in section one [1] [§

34-12-102

] of this act [§§

34-12-101

through

34-12-115

], the county clerk shall notify some, or all, of such owners and proprietors by mail or otherwise, and demand the execution of said plat as provided; and if such owners or proprietors, whether so notified or not, fail and neglect to execute and file for record said plat for thirty (30) days after the issuance of such notice, the county clerk shall cause to be made the plat of such subdivision, and any surveying necessary therefor. Said plat shall be signed and acknowledged by the county clerk, who shall certify that he executed it by reason of the failure of the owners or proprietors named to do so, and filed for record; and when so filed for record, shall have the same effect for all purposes as if executed, acknowledged and recorded by the owners or proprietors themselves. A correct statement of the costs and expenses of such plat, surveying and recording, verified by oath, shall be by the county clerk laid before the first session of the county commissioners, who shall allow the same and order the same to be paid out of the county treasury, and who shall, at the same time, assess the same amount pro rata, upon all the several subdivisions of said tract, parcel or lot so subdivided; and said assessment shall be collected with, and in like manner as the general taxes and shall go to the general county fund; or said county commissioners may direct suit to be brought in the name of the county before any court having jurisdiction, to recover of the said original owners or proprietors, or either of them, the said cost and expense of procuring and recording said plat.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 116, § 10; R.S. 1887, § 1409; R.S. 1899, § 776; C.S. 1910, § 1860; C.S. 1920, § 2144; R.S. 1931, § 116-210; C.S. 1945, § 29-1110; W.S. 1957, § 34-123.

Ratification of plat by mortgagee. —

Mortgagee assented to and ratified dedication of property to the public where mortgage described the property by referring to proposed subdivision, the mortgagee never objected to subdivision being established or property being dedicated to public use, and it executed an addendum to plat stating it had been omitted from the plat in error and agreed to ratify the plat. River Props. Pshp. v. Willoughby, 944 P.2d 1145,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

Tobin v. Pursel, 539 P.2d 361,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1975).

§ 34-12-113.
Procedure when ownership in severalty and description uncertain.

Whenever any congressional subdivision of land of forty (40) acres of land, or less, or any lot or subdivision is owned by two (2) or more persons in severalty, and the description of one (1) or more of the different parts or parcels thereof, cannot, in the judgment of the county clerk, be made sufficiently certain and accurate for the purposes of assessment and taxation without noting the metes and bounds of the same, said county clerk shall require, and cause to be made and recorded, a plat of such tract or lot of land, with its several subdivisions, in accordance with the provisions of (this act [§§

34-12-101

through

34-12-104

,

34-12-106

through

34-12-115

], and he shall proceed in such cases according to the provisions of) W.S.

34-12-112

, and all the provisions of said section in relation to plats of towns, cities, and so forth, shall govern as to the tracts and parcels of land in this section referred to.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 116, § 11; R.S. 1887, § 1410; R.S. 1899, § 777; C.S. 1910, § 1861; C.S. 1920, § 2145; R.S. 1931, § 116-211; C.S. 1945, § 29-1111; W.S. 1957, § 34-124.

§ 34-12-114.
Warranty of accurate description; notice if inaccurate description; proceedings upon repeal.

Every conveyance of land in this state shall be deemed to be a warranty that the description therein contained is sufficiently definite and accurate, to enable the county clerk to make entries as required by law to be kept; and when there is presented for entry any conveyance in which the description is not, in the opinion of the county clerk, sufficiently definite and accurate, he shall note said fact on said deed with that of the entry for transfer, and shall notify the person presenting the same, that the land therein not sufficiently described, must be platted within thirty (30) days thereafter. Any person aggrieved by the opinion of the county clerk may, within said thirty (30) days, appeal therefrom to the county commissioners, by claiming said appeal in writing, and thereupon, no further proceedings shall be taken by the county clerk; and at their next session the county commissioners shall determine said question, and direct whether or not said plat shall be executed and filed, and within what time, and if the grantor in such conveyance shall neglect for thirty (30) days thereafter to file for record a plat of said land, and of the appropriate congressional subdivision in which the same is found, duly executed and acknowledged as required by the county clerk, or, in case of appeal, as directed by the county commissioners, then the county clerk shall proceed, as is provided in W.S.

34-12-112

, and cause such plat to be made and recorded, and thereupon the same proceedings shall be had, and rights shall accrue, and remedies had as are in said section provided. Such plat shall describe said tract of land, and any other subdivision of the smallest congressional subdivision of which the same is a part, numbering them by progressive numbers, setting forth the courses and distances, and numbers of acres, and such other memoranda as are usual and proper; and descriptions of such lots or subdivisions according to the number and designation thereof on said plat, shall be deemed good and sufficient for all purposes of conveyancing and taxation.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 116,§ 12; R.S. 1887, § 1411; R.S. 1899, § 778; C.S. 1910, § 1862; C.S. 1920, § 2146; R.S. 1931, § 116-212; C.S. 1945, § 29-1112; W.S. 1957, § 34-125; 2019 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the first sentence, substituted "make entries as" for "enter the same on the plat book” and substituted "for entry" for ", to be entered on the transfer book,"

§ 34-12-115.
Selling lots not platted prohibited.

No person shall sell, as defined in W.S. 18-5-302(a)(v), any lots in any town, or addition to any town or city, until the plat thereof has been duly acknowledged and recorded as provided in this act [§§

34-12-101

through

34-12-115

].

The provisions of this section are enforceable by all appropriate legal remedies including but not limited to injunctive relief or a writ of mandamus.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 116, § 14; R.S. 1887, § 1413; R.S. 1899, § 780; C.S. 1910, § 1864; C.S. 1920, § 2148; R.S. 1931, § 116-214; C.S. 1945, § 29-1114; W.S. 1957, § 34-126; 2011, ch. 174, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “No person shall sell, as defined in W.S. 18-5-302(a)(v)” for “Any person shall dispose of, or offer for sale, or lease,” and deleted “shall forfeit and pay fifty dollars ($50.00) for each lot, and part of lot sold, leased or disposed of, or offered for sale” at the end; and added (b).